data/dictionaries/apertium/apertium-ell.ell.dix
    <pardef n="συγκ/έντρωση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>έντρωση</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έντρωσης</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έντρωση</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>έντρωση</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εντρώσεις</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εντρώσεων</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εντρώσεως</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εντρώσεις</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>εντρώσεις</l><r>έντρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/όσμημα__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>όσμημα</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσμήματος</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όσμημα</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όσμημα</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσμήματα</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσμημάτων</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσμήματα</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσμήματα</l><r>όσμημα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μπά/ρμπας__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ρμπας</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ρμπα</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ρμπα</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ρμπα</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μπαρδες</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μπαρδων</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μπαρδες</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>μπαρδες</l><r>ρμπας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μεταμ/όσχευση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>όσχευση</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όσχευσης</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όσχευση</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όσχευση</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσχεύσεις</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσχεύσεων</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσχεύσεως</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσχεύσεις</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οσχεύσεις</l><r>όσχευση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="απ/όδραση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>όδραση</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όδρασης</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όδραση</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>όδραση</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οδράσεις</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οδράσεων</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οδράσεως</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οδράσεις</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>οδράσεις</l><r>όδραση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="επ/ίσταξη__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ίσταξη</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσταξης</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσταξη</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ίσταξη</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάξεις</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάξεων</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάξεως</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάξεις</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ιστάξεις</l><r>ίσταξη<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σ/ύμβολο__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ύμβολο</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υμβόλου</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύμβολο</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύμβολο</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύμβολα</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υμβόλων</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύμβολα</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύμβολα</l><r>ύμβολο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/ύρωση__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ύρωση</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύρωσης</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύρωση</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ύρωση</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υρώσεις</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υρώσεων</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υρώσεως</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υρώσεις</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>υρώσεις</l><r>ύρωση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="βρ/άδυ__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>άδυ</l><r>άδυ<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αδιού</l><r>άδυ<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άδυ</l><r>άδυ<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>άδια</l><r>άδυ<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>αδιών</l><r>άδυ<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="πέ/ος__n_nt">
      <e><p><l>ος</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ους</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>η</l><r>ος<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="σύμβολο"><i>σ</i><par n="σ/ύμβολο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μπάρμπας"><i>μπά</i><par n="μπά/ρμπας__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="βράδυ"><i>βρ</i><par n="βρ/άδυ__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πέος"><i>πέ</i><par n="πέ/ος__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κόσμημα"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/όσμημα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="επίσταξη"><i>επ</i><par n="επ/ίσταξη__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="κύρωση"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/ύρωση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ακύρωση"><i>ακ</i><par n="κ/ύρωση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="συγκέντρωση"><i>συγκ</i><par n="συγκ/έντρωση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="μεταμόσχευση"><i>μεταμ</i><par n="μεταμ/όσχευση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="απόδραση"><i>απ</i><par n="απ/όδραση__n_f"/></e>
